Maryland, session 2025, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–106.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “APPOINTED MEMBER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL SERVING ON
A COUNTY BOARD WHO IS APPOINTED TO THE POSITION BY A GOVERNMENT
OFFICIAL OR GOVERNMENTAL BODY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1252*

HOUSE BILL 1252
(II) “APPOINTED MEMBER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A MEMBER
SERVING ON A COUNTY BOARD WHO IS APPOINTED TO FILL A VACANCY FOR AN
ELECTED POSITION ON THE COUNTY BOARD.
(3) “LEADERSHIP POSITION” MEANS A PRESIDENT, VICE PRESIDENT,
CHAIR, OR VICE CHAIR OF A COUNTY BOARD.
(B) (1) AN APPOINTED MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE IN A LEADERSHIP
POSITION ON A COUNTY BOARD.
(2) AN APPOINTED MEMBER SERVING IN A LEADERSHIP POSITION ON
JULY 1, 2025, SHALL VACATE THE LEADERSHIP POSITION ON OR BEFORE AUGUST
1, 2025.
(C) (1) IF A COUNTY BOARD VIOLATES THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL NOTIFY THE COUNTY BOARD IN WRITING AND REQUIRE IMMEDIATE
CORRECTIVE ACTION.
(2) (I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH A COUNTY
BOARD RECEIVES THE NOTIFICATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL REMOVE THE APPOINTED MEMBER FROM THE
LEADERSHIP POSITION.
(II) IF A COUNTY BOARD DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUSPEND ANY FUNDING TO
THE COUNTY BOARD FOR ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS UNTIL THE VIOLATION IS
REMEDIED; AND
2. THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL POST NOTICE OF THE
VIOLATION ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S WEBSITE.
(3) IF A COUNTY BOARD DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COUNTY BOARD RECEIVES THE NOTIFICATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) WITHHOLD ADDITIONAL FUNDING TO THE COUNTY BOARD
FOR ADMINISTRATIVE FUNCTIONS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1252 3
(II) REFER THE MATTER TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR
ENFORCEMENT.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY ON AN
APPOINTED MEMBER WHO KNOWINGLY AND WILLFULLY CONTINUES TO SERVE IN A
LEADERSHIP POSITION IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. MAY NOT EXCEED $2,500; AND
2. SHALL BE PAYABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.